utilities/dictionaries/lv_LV-Latvian.aff
SFX t Y 26
SFX t a   iņām   [^gk]a  is:ddd
SFX t a   iņās   [^gk]a  is:ddl
SFX t ga  dziņām   [g]a  is:ddd
SFX t ga  dziņās   [g]a  is:ddl
SFX t ka  ciņām  [^s]ka  is:ddd
SFX t ka  ciņās  [^s]ka  is:ddl
SFX t a   iņām    [s]ka  is:ddd
SFX t a   iņās    [s]ka  is:ddl
SFX t as  iņu   [^gk]as  is:ddg
SFX t as  iņām  [^gk]as  is:ddd
SFX t as  iņās  [^gk]as  is:ddl
SFX t gas dziņu   [g]as  is:ddg
SFX t gas dziņām  [g]as  is:ddd
SFX t gas dziņās  [g]as  is:ddl
SFX t kas ciņu  [^s]kas  is:ddg
SFX t kas ciņām [^s]kas  is:ddd
SFX t kas ciņās [^s]kas  is:ddl
SFX t as   iņu   [s]kas  is:ddg
SFX t as   iņām  [s]kas  is:ddd
SFX t as   iņās  [s]kas  is:ddl
SFX t e    īšu    e     is:ddg
SFX t e    ītēm   e     is:ddd
SFX t e    ītēs   e     is:ddl
SFX t es   īšu    es    is:ddg
SFX t es   ītēm   es    is:ddd
SFX t es   ītēs   es    is:ddl

SFX W Y 44
SFX W s a     s
SFX W s am    s
SFX W s u     s
SFX W s ā     s
SFX W s i     s
SFX W s iem   s
SFX W s us    s
SFX W s os    s
SFX W s as    s
SFX W s ai    s
SFX W s ām    s
SFX W s ās    s
SFX W s ais   s
SFX W s ajam  s
SFX W s o     s
SFX W s ajā   s
SFX W s ie    s
SFX W s ajiem s
SFX W s ajos  s
SFX W s ajai  s
SFX W s ajām  s
SFX W s ajās  s
SFX W š a     š
SFX W š am    š
SFX W š u     š
SFX W š ā     š
SFX W š i     š
SFX W š iem   š
SFX W š us    š
SFX W š os    š
SFX W š as    š
SFX W š ai    š
SFX W š ām    š
SFX W š ās    š
SFX W š ais   š
SFX W š ajam  š
SFX W š o     š
SFX W š ajā   š
SFX W š ie    š
SFX W š ajiem š
SFX W š ajos  š
SFX W š ajai  š
SFX W š ajām  š
SFX W š ajās  š

SFX Y Y 42
SFX Y s āk    [s]
SFX Y s āks   [s]
SFX Y s āka   [s]
SFX Y s ākas  [s]
SFX Y s ākam  [s]
SFX Y s ākai  [s]
SFX Y s āku   [s]
SFX Y s ākā   [s]
SFX Y s āki   [s]
SFX Y s ākiem [s]
SFX Y s ākām  [s]
SFX Y s ākus  [s]
SFX Y s ākos  [s]
SFX Y s ākās  [s]
SFX Y š āk    [š]
SFX Y š āks   [š]
SFX Y š āka   [š]
SFX Y š ākas  [š]
SFX Y š ākam  [š]
SFX Y š ākai  [š]
SFX Y š āku   [š]
SFX Y š ākā   [š]
SFX Y š āki   [š]
SFX Y š ākiem [š]
SFX Y š ākām  [š]
SFX Y š ākus  [š]
SFX Y š ākos  [š]
SFX Y š ākās  [š]
SFX Y 0 tāk   [āēīo]t
SFX Y 0 tāks  [āēīo]t
SFX Y 0 tāka  [āēīo]t
SFX Y 0 tākas [āēīo]t
SFX Y 0 tākam [āēīo]t
SFX Y 0 tākai [āēīo]t
SFX Y 0 tāku  [āēīo]t
SFX Y 0 tākā  [āēīo]t
SFX Y 0 tāki  [āēīo]t
SFX Y 0 tākiem [āēīo]t
SFX Y 0 tākām [āēīo]t
SFX Y 0 tākus [āēīo]t
SFX Y 0 tākos [āēīo]t
SFX Y 0 tākās [āēīo]t


SFX X Y 50
SFX X s āk/[|   [s]
SFX X s ākais   [s]
SFX X s ākais/[|   [s]
SFX X s ākā   [s]
SFX X s ākā/[|   [s]
SFX X s ākās   [s]
SFX X s ākās/[|   [s]
SFX X s ākajam  [s]
SFX X s ākajam/[|  [s]
SFX X s ākajai  [s]
SFX X s ākajai/[|  [s]
SFX X s āko     [s]
SFX X s āko/[|     [s]
SFX X s ākajā   [s]
SFX X s ākajā/[|   [s]
SFX X s ākie    [s]
SFX X s ākie/[|    [s]
SFX X s ākajiem [s]
SFX X s ākajiem/[| [s]
SFX X s ākajām  [s]
SFX X s ākajām/[|  [s]
SFX X s ākajos  [s]
SFX X s ākajos/[|  [s]
SFX X s ākajās  [s]
SFX X s ākajās/[|  [s]
SFX X š āk/[|   [š]
SFX X š ākais   [š]
SFX X š ākais/[|   [š]
SFX X š ākā   [š]
SFX X š ākā/[|   [š]
SFX X š ākās   [š]
SFX X š ākās/[|   [š]
SFX X š ākajam  [š]
SFX X š ākajam/[|  [š]
SFX X š ākajai  [š]
SFX X š ākajai/[|  [š]
SFX X š āko     [š]
SFX X š āko/[|     [š]
SFX X š ākajā   [š]
SFX X š ākajā/[|   [š]
SFX X š ākie    [š]
SFX X š ākie/[|    [š]
SFX X š ākajiem [š]
SFX X š ākajiem/[| [š]
SFX X š ākajām  [š]
SFX X š ākajām/[|  [š]
SFX X š ākajos  [š]
SFX X š ākajos/[|  [š]
SFX X š ākajās  [š]
SFX X š ākajās/[|  [š]



SFX y Y 32
SFX y ais 0 [^mšt]ais
SFX y ais ā    [^z]ais
SFX y ais ās   [^z]ais
SFX y is  jam  [^z]ais
SFX y is  jai  [^z]ais
SFX y ais o    [^z]ais
SFX y is  jā   [^z]ais
SFX y ais ie   [^z]ais
SFX y is  jiem [^z]ais
SFX y is  jām  [^z]ais
SFX y ais os   [^z]ais
SFX y is  jos  [^z]ais
SFX y is  jās  [^z]ais
SFX y ais ā    [^d]zais
SFX y ais ās   [^d]zais
SFX y is  jam  [^d]zais
SFX y is  jai  [^d]zais
SFX y ais o    [^d]zais
SFX y is  jā   [^d]zais
SFX y ais ie   [^d]zais
SFX y is  jiem [^d]zais
SFX y is  jām  [^d]zais
SFX y ais os   [^d]zais
SFX y is  jos  [^d]zais
SFX y is  jās  [^d]zais
SFX y ais ās   [d]zais
SFX y ais o    [d]zais
SFX y ais ie   [d]zais
SFX y is  jiem [d]zais
SFX y is  jām  [d]zais
SFX y is  jos  [d]zais
SFX y is  jās  [d]zais
SFX w Y 25
SFX w  i   u    [i]
SFX w  i   as   [i]
SFX w  i   iem  [i]
SFX w  i   ām   [i]
SFX w  i   ās   [i]
SFX w  i   os   [i]
SFX w  i   us   [i]
SFX w  0   ais/y   t
SFX w  0   ais/y   š
SFX w  ci  ktais/y ci
SFX w  ši  stais/y ši
SFX w  iņi ītais/y iņi
SFX w  oņi otais/y oņi
SFX w  viens pirmais/y viens
SFX w  četri ceturtais/y četri
SFX w  dzi  dzais/{y dzi
SFX w  īs  iju     īs
SFX w  īs  ijas    īs
SFX w  īs  ijiem   īs
SFX w  īs  ijām    īs
SFX w  īs  ijās    īs
SFX w  īs  ijos    īs
SFX w  iš  ijus    īs
SFX w  īs  ešais/y īs
SFX w  s   ais/y   [^e][dnt]s

SFX V Y 94
SFX V es manis es  is:vpg
SFX V es man   es  is:vpd
SFX V es mani  es  is:vpa
SFX V es manī  es  is:vpl
SFX V tu tevis tu  is:vpg
SFX V tu tev   tu  is:vpd
SFX V tu tevi  tu  is:vpa
SFX V tu tevī  tu  is:vpl
SFX V ēs ūsu   ēs  is:dpg
SFX V ēs ums   ēs  is:dpd
SFX V ēs ūs    ēs  is:dpa
SFX V ēs ūsos  ēs  is:dpl
SFX V 0  u     ūs  is:dpg
SFX V ūs ums   ūs  is:dpd
SFX V 0  os    ūs  is:dpl
SFX V is 0  [v]is
SFX V s  0  [v]is
SFX V as ā  [k]as  is:vpg
SFX V s  m  [k]as  is:vpd
SFX V as o  [k]as  is:vpa
SFX V as ā  [t]as
SFX V s  m  [t]as
SFX V as o  [t]as
SFX V s  jā [t]as
SFX V as ās [t]as
SFX V s  i  [t]as
SFX V as ie   [t]as
SFX V as iem  [t]as
SFX V as os   [t]as
SFX V as ajos [t]as
SFX V as ām   [t]as
SFX V as ajās [t]as
SFX V is ā   [^v]is
SFX V s  m   [^v]is
SFX V is o   [^v]is
SFX V is ajā [^v]is
SFX V is ī   [^v]is
SFX V is īs  [^v]is
SFX V is ai  [^v]is
SFX V is ie    [^v]is
SFX V is iem   [^v]is
SFX V is os    [^v]is
SFX V is ajos  [^v]is
SFX V is īm    [^v]is
SFX V is ajās  [^v]is
SFX V ts  ša  ts
SFX V ts  šam ts
SFX V ts  šu  ts
SFX V ts  šā  ts
SFX V s   i   ts
SFX V ts  šas ts
SFX V ts  šai ts
SFX V ts  ši   ts
SFX V ts  šiem ts
SFX V ts  šus  ts
SFX V ts  šos  ts
SFX V ts  šām  ts
SFX V ts  šās  ts
SFX V š  a   š
SFX V š  am  š
SFX V š  u   š
SFX V š  ā   š
SFX V š  as  š
SFX V š  ai  š
SFX V š  i   š
SFX V š  iem š
SFX V š  us  š
SFX V š  os  š
SFX V š  ām  š
SFX V š  ās  š
SFX V s  a   [^ait]s
SFX V s  am  [^ait]s
SFX V s  u   [^ait]s
SFX V s  ā   [^ait]s
SFX V s  as  [^ait]s
SFX V s  ai  [^ait]s
SFX V s  i   [^ait]s
SFX V s  iem [^ait]s
SFX V s  us  [^ait]s
SFX V s  os  [^ait]s
SFX V s  ām  [^ait]s
SFX V s  ās  [^ait]s
SFX V s  a   [^a]ts
SFX V s  am  [^a]ts
SFX V s  u   [^a]ts
SFX V s  ā   [^a]ts
SFX V s  as  [^a]ts
SFX V s  ai  [^a]ts
SFX V s  i   [^a]ts
SFX V s  iem [^a]ts
SFX V s  us  [^a]ts
SFX V s  os  [^a]ts
SFX V s  ām  [^a]ts
SFX V s  ās  [^a]ts
